Utah statutes.
53A-1-606.6.   Students reading below grade level -- Report to Education
Interim Committee -- Rulemaking.
(1) (a)  A school district or charter school shall:
(i)  notify a parent or guardian of a first, second, or third grade student,
prior to the midpoint of the school year, that the first, second, or third
grade student is reading below grade level, as determined by multiple
assessments administered pursuant to this part, and pursuant to rules enacted
under Subsection (2);
(ii)  provide information to a parent or guardian of a student described in
Subsection (1)(a)(i) regarding reading remediation inteventions available
through the school district or charter school; and
(iii)  provide focused reading remediation through appropriate interventions
that may include tutoring, before and after school programs, or summer school
assistance.
(b)  A school district or charter school shall provide the following to the
parent or guardian of a student described in Subsection (1)(a)(i):
(i)  a notification described in Subsection (1)(a)(i); and
(ii)  information provided pursuant to Subsection (1)(a)(ii).
(2)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the State Board of Education shall make rules defining expected reading
levels for first, second, and third grades.
(3)  On or before the November meeting of the Education Interim Committee of
each year, the State Board of Education shall report:
(a)  the number of students reading below grade level described in Subsection
(1)(a)(i) identified during the prior school year; and
(b)  the number of students described in Subsection (1)(a)(i) who received
reading intervention during the prior school year.
(4)  Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to imply that a student may,
or may not be advanced to the next grade level based on the student's reading
ability measured in accordance with this section.
